hr-HR: Oblik lule: Apple; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Egg; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Kruška; Poker; Prince; Tomato; Volcano; Ostalo
fr: Forme de la pipe: Pomme; Billiard; Poisson-globe; Bouledogue; Calebasse; Canadienne; Cavalier; Chimneys; Marguillier; Cutty; Dublin; Œuf; Freehand; Calebasse de courge; Lovat; Panel; Poire; Poker; Prince; Tomate; Volcan; Autre
it: Forma del tubo: Mela; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadese; Cavalier; Chimney; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Ovoidale; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Pannello; Pera; Poker; Prince; Pomodoro; Volcano; Altro
hu: Pipa alakja: Apple; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Egg; Szabadkézi; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Pear; Poker; Prince; Tomato; Volcano; Egyéb
de: Pfeifenform: Apple; Billard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Ei; Freehand; Kalebasse Calabash; Lovat; Panel; Birne; Poker; Prince; Tomate; Volcano; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Pypkės forma: „Apple“; „Billiard“; „Blowfish“; „Bulldog“; „Calabash“ (kalabašas); „Canadian“; „Cavalier“; „Chimney“; „Churchwarden“; „Cutty“; „Dublin“; „Egg“; „Freehand“; „Gourd Calabash“; „Lovat“; „Panel“; „Pear“; „Poker“; „Prince“; „Tomato“; „Volcano“; Kita
el: Σχήμα πίπας: Μήλο; Μπιλιάρδο; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Αυγό; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Πλέγμα; Αχλάδι; Poker; Prince; Tomato; Volcano; Άλλο
sl-SI: Oblika cevi: Jabolko; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Jajčasta; Prostoročna; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panela; Hruška; Poker; Prince; Tomato; Volcano; Drugo
es: Forma de pipa: Manzana; Billar; Pez globo; Bulldog; Calabaza; Canadiense; Cavalier; Chimeneas; Capellán; Corto; Dublín; Huevo; Freehand; Calabaza de cabaña; Lovat; Panel; Pera; Póker; Príncipe; Tomate; Volcano; Otros
nl: Leidingvorm: Appel; Biljart; Kogelvis; Bulldog; Kalebas; Canadees; Cavalier; Schoorstenen; Kerkmeester; Cutty; Dublin; Ei; Uit de vrije hand; Pompoenkalebas; Lovat; Paneel; Peer; Poker; Prins; Tomaat; Vulkaan; Andere
ko: 파이프 모양: 사과; 당구; 복어; 불도그; 조롱박; 캐네디언; 카발리에; 굴뚝; 교구 위원; 커티; 더블린; 계란; 자유형; 조롱박 호리병; 로바트; 패널; 배; 포커; 프린스; 토마토; 화산; 기타
pt-PT: Forma do cachimbo: Maçã; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Ovo; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Pera; Poker; Prince; Tomate; Volcano; Outro
th: รูปทรงท่อ: แอปเปิล; ทรงบิลเลียด; ทรงปักเป้า; ทรงบูลด็อก; ทรงน้ำเต้า; ทรงแคนาดา; ทรงทหารม้า; ทรงปล่องไฟ; ทรงยาว; ทรงคัตตี้; ทรงดับลิน; ทรงไข่; ทรงสลักมือ; ทรงลูกน้ำเต้า; ทรงโลเวต; ทรงเหลี่ยม; ทรงลูกแพร์; ทรงโป๊กเกอร์; ทรงปรินซ์; มะเขือเทศ; ทรงภูเขาไฟ; อื่นๆ
ru: Форма трубки: Яблоко; Бильярд; Иглобрюх; Бульдог; Калебас; Канадская; Кавалер; Дымоходы; Церковный староста; Катти; Дублин; Яйцо; Свободные руки; Тыквенный калебас; Ловат; Панель; Груша; Покер; Принц; Томат; Вулкан; Другое
vi: Hình dạng ống dẫn: Táo; Bi-a; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canada; Cavalier; Chimney; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Quả trứng; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Lê; Poker; Prince; Cà chua; Volcano; Khác
fi: Putken muoto: Omena; Biljardipallo; Blowfish; Bulldoggi; Calabash; Kanadalainen; Cavalier; Chimney; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Kananmuna; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Paneeli; Päärynä; Pokeri; Prinssi; Tomaatti; Tulivuori; Muu
ro-RO: Forma pipei: Apple; Biliard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Egg; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Pear; Poker; Prince; Tomato; Volcano; Altele
zh-TW: 管材形狀: 蘋果; 撞球; 河豚; 鬥牛犬; 葫蘆; 加拿大; 騎士; 煙囪; 教堂管理員; 卡蒂; 都柏林; 蛋; 寫意; 壺蘆; 洛瓦特; 面板; 梨形; 撲克; 王子; 番茄; 火山; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на лула: Ябълка; Билярд; Риба балон; Булдог; Калабаш; Канадска; Кавалер; Комини; Църковен настоятел; Cutty; Дъблин; Яйце; Свободна ръка; Тиква калабаш; Ловат; Панел; Круша; Покер; Принц; Домат; Вулкан; Други
tr: Boru Şekli: Elma; Bilardo; Balon balığı; Bulldog; Su kabağı; Kanadalı; Şövalye; Bacalar; Kilise muhafızı; Kısa; Dublin; Yumurta; Serbest; Asma su kabağı; Lovat; Panel; Armut; Poker; Prens; Domates; Volkan; Diğer
zh-CN: 管材形状: 苹果; 台球; 河豚; 斗牛犬; 葫芦; 加拿大风格; 骑士; 烟囱; 陶制长烟斗; 短柄烟斗; 都柏林; 蛋; 手绘; 瓠瓜; 杂绿色; 板; 梨; 扑克; 王子; 番茄; 火山; 其他
ja: パイプ形状: アップル; ビリヤード; ブロウフィッシュ; ブルドッグ; カラバッシュ; カナディアン; キャバリエ; チムニー; チャーチワーデン; カティ; ダブリン; 卵; フリーハンド; カラバッシュ; ロバット; パネル; 洋梨; ポーカー; プリンス; トマト; ボルケーノ; その他
sk-SK: Tvar fajky: Jablko; Billiard; Blowfish; Buldog; Calabash; Kanadský; Cavalier; Komíny; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Vajíčko; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Hruškový; Poker; Princ; Paradajka; Volcano; Iné
pl: Kształt rury: Jabłko; Bilard; Rozdymkowate; Buldog angielski; Tykwa pospolita; Kanadyjska; Kawalerowie; Kominy; Strażnik kościoła; Cutty; Dublin; Jajka; Łamana; Kalabasz dyniowy; Lovat; Panel; Gruszka; Poker; Prince; Pomidor; Wulkan; Pozostałe
pt-BR: Formato do tubo: Maçã; Billiard; Baiacu; Buldogue; Cabaça; Canadense; Cavalheiro; Chaminés; Diretor da Igreja; Fofinho; Dublin; Ovo; À mão livre; Cabaça; Lovat; Painel; Pera; Pôquer; Príncipe; Tomate; Vulcão; Outro
da: Rørform: Æble; Billiard; Kuglefisk; Bulldog; Kalabas; Canadisk; Cavalier; Skorstene; Kirkeværge; Cutty; Dublin; Æg; Frihånd; Kalabas; Lovat; Panel; Pære; Poker; Prins; Tomat; Vulkan; Andet
en: Pipe shape: Apple; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Egg; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Pear; Poker; Prince; Tomato; Volcano; Other
cs: Tvar dýmky: Apple; Billiard; Blowfish; Bulldog; Calabash; Canadian; Cavalier; Chimneys; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Vejce; Freehand; Gourd calabash; Lovat; Panel; Hruška; Poker; Prince; Rajče; Volcano; Jiné
nb: Rørform: Eple; Billiard; Pinnsvinfisk; Bulldog; Kalebass; Kanadisk; Cavalier; Skorsteiner; Kirkeverge; Cutty; Dublin; Egg; Frihånd; Kalebass; Lovat; Panel; Pære; Poker; Prins; Tomat; Vulkan; Annen
sv: Rörform: Äpple; Billiard; Blåsfisk; Bulldog; Kalebass; Kanadensisk; Cavalier; Skorstenar; Churchwarden; Cutty; Dublin; Ägg; Frihand; Kalebass kalebass; Lovat; Panel; Päron; Poker; Prins; Tomat; Vulkan; Annat